Hawaii, session 2025, SB614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that "La Ku oko a", or Hawaiian independence day, was a national holiday celebrated annually on November 28 to commemorate the signing of the Anglo‑Franco Proclamation of 1843.  The proclamation represented the official diplomatic recognition of the independence and sovereignty of the Hawaiian Kingdom by Great Britain and France. Hawaiian independence day is particularly important amongst the Hawaiian sovereignty movement since it symbolizes that the Hawaiian Kingdom was a sovereign nation-state having international recognition by world powers prior to the overthrow of the monarchy and subsequent annexation by the United States.  The holiday is still celebrated by many Native Hawaiians and residents of the State.  Hawaiian independence day holds cultural and historical significance and represents an affirmation of identity and joyful pride for the people of Hawaii. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish "La Ku oko a", or Hawaiian independence day, as a state holiday, and in doing so, recognize the compelling history of Hawaiian independence and memorialize the injustice of the overthrow of the Hawaiian Kingdom. SECTION 2.  Section 8-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§8-1  Holidays designated.  The following days of each year are set apart and established as state holidays: The first day in January, New Year's Day; The third Monday in January, Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., Day; The third Monday in February, Presidents' Day; The twenty-sixth day in March, Prince Jonah Kuhio Kalanianaole Day; The Friday preceding Easter Sunday, Good Friday; The last Monday in May, Memorial Day; The eleventh day in June, King Kamehameha I Day; The fourth day in July, Independence Day; The third Friday in August, Statehood Day; The first Monday in September, Labor Day; The eleventh day in November, Veterans' Day; The twenty-eighth day in November, La Ku oko a, or Hawaiian Independence Day; The fourth Thursday in November, Thanksgiving Day; The twenty-fifth day in December, Christmas Day; All election days, except primary and special election days, in the county wherein the election is held; Any day designated by proclamation by the President of the United States or by the governor as a holiday." SECTION 3.  Section 8-36, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed. ["[§8-36]  La Kuokoa; Hawaiian Independence Day.  November 28 of each year shall be known and designated as La Kuokoa, Hawaiian Independence Day, to celebrate the historical recognition of the independence of the Kingdom of Hawaii.  This day is not and shall not be construed to be a state holiday."] SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________